Wyoming, session 2025, SF0118.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 23-1-302(h) is amended to read:

23-1-302. Powers and duties.

(h) For purposes of promoting the maintenance of
wildlife habitat and attaining wildlife management
objectives pursuant to W.S. 23-1-103 and in addition to
duties prescribed under paragraph (a)(xiv) of this section,
SF0118

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0576
the commission shall promulgate rules and regulations
governing the issuance of elk, deer, antelope and turkey
hunting licenses to Wyoming landowners without subjection
to prescribed means of competitive public issuance. Fees
assessed for licenses authorized under this subsection
shall be equal to fees prescribed under W.S. 23-2-101(j)
for each species for which the license is issued. A
landowner who has obtained a hunting license under this
subsection shall be authorized to sell the hunting license
to another person in accordance with the following:

(i) Licenses issued to anyone other than the
landowner, including immediate family of the landowner,
shall not be eligible for sale under this subsection;

(ii) The purchaser shall be subject to all
applicable statutes and regulations concerning hunting
licenses pursuant to this subsection;

(iii) The commission shall promulgate rules and
regulations that govern the sale of hunting licenses and
re-issuance of the hunting license to another person once
SF0118

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0576
they have been issued by the department, pursuant to this
subsection;

(iv) Licenses that are sold to another person
authorized by this subsection shall be exempt from a
landowner coupon payment pursuant to W.S. 23-3-105(b).

Section 2. The game and fish department shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 3.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0118